Utah statutes.
13-9-1.   "Foreign-Trade Zones Act" defined.

As used in this act:

Foreign-Trade Zones Act means the act passed by the United States Congress identified as the Foreign-Trade Zones Act of June 18, 1934 (48 Stat. 998-1003; 19 U.S.C. 81a-81u), as amended by Public Law 566, 81st Congress, approved June 17, 1950, together with any subsequent amendments to that act and any rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to the authority granted by the act.

